California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) The suspension shall remain in effect until the board determines that the matters jeopardizing the health and safety of the horses or riders that are present at the racing meeting have been adequately addressed.

(4) As a condition of
 lifting the suspension, the board may require a licensee to comply with additional safety standards or other requirements as it deems necessary or desirable for the best interests of horse racing and the purposes of this chapter.

(5) The suspension is not a revocation subject to the proceedings required by Section 19461, regardless of any effect on a license issued under this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), an emergency meeting may be called at any time by the chairperson of the board, the executive director, or by a majority of the members of the board to consider suspending a license to conduct a racing meeting when there
 exists an emergency situation involving matters upon which prompt action is necessary to protect the health and safety of the horses or riders that are present at the racing meeting.

(2) An emergency meeting held pursuant to this section is exempt from the 10-day notice requirement of Section 11125 of the Government Code or the 48-hour notice requirement of Section 11125.4 of the Government Code if the delay necessitated by those requirements would significantly and adversely impact the board’s ability to protect the health and safety of the horses or riders that were present at the racing meeting.

(3) Before the commencement of the emergency meeting, the board shall make a finding in open session that the delay necessitated by providing the 10-day notice required by Section 11125
 of the Government Code or 48 hours before a meeting as required by Section 11125.4 of the Government Code would significantly and adversely impact the board’s ability to protect the health and safety of the horses or riders that are present at that racing meeting. The finding shall be adopted by a vote of at least four members of the board. Failure to adopt the finding shall terminate the meeting.

(4) Newspapers of general circulation and radio or television stations that have requested notice of meetings pursuant to Section 11125 of the Government Code shall be notified by the executive director, or a designee thereof, at least one hour before the emergency meeting by telephone. Notice shall also be made available on the board’s internet website as soon as is practicable after the decision to call the emergency meeting has been made.
 Notwithstanding Section 11125 of the Government Code, the board may take action at the emergency meeting on an item of business involving the emergency situation that is not included in the agenda, if any, that accompanies a notice provided pursuant to this paragraph.

(5) The minutes of the emergency meeting, a copy of the rollcall vote, and any action taken at the meeting shall be posted for a minimum of 10 days in a public place as soon after the meeting as is possible.

(c) (1) It is unlawful to conduct a racing meeting under a license suspended pursuant to this section or, if the suspension is lifted, without meeting a condition imposed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(2) The board shall review any action taken under this section within 10 calendar days.

(3) Nothing in this section supersedes or limits the board’s authority to suspend or deny a license under any other law, rule, or regulation.

(d) The board shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to implement this section. The board may readopt, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted as authorized by this section. No such regulation shall be
 readopted on an emergency basis pursuant to this section more than a total of two times. Notwithstanding any other law, the initial adoption of emergency regulations and the readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   (SB 469)   Effective June 26, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19482.

No license to conduct a horse racing meeting shall be issued to any of the following:

(a) Any nonprofit corporation entitled to an exemption from any tax imposed by this State.

(b) Any applicant who proposes to conduct a horse racing meeting for the benefit of any such nonprofit corporation or under any arrangement pursuant to which such nonprofit corporation is to share in the receipts of the licensee from the conduct of such meeting, whether by rentals or otherwise.

Nothing in this section prohibits the
 board, in its discretion, from issuing a license to conduct a horse racing meeting to any corporation to which it has, prior to September 7, 1955, issued a license to conduct such a meeting.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19483.

Unless the board finds that the purpose of this chapter will be better served thereby, no license to conduct a horseracing meeting at any track shall be issued to any person or held by any person having any financial interest in the conduct of any horseracing meeting by any other person at any other track in this State.

Ownership of stock in one corporation by another corporation constitutes a financial interest within the meaning of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2059.)
-------------------------------------------

19484.

Unless the board finds that the purpose of this chapter will be better served thereby, no person licensed under this article to conduct a horseracing meeting at any place, track or inclosure shall own or acquire any stock or hold or obtain any other financial interest in any other track of another such licensee or in the operation thereof, or in the operation of authorized wagering on the results of horseraces at any such other track.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2059.)
-------------------------------------------

19485.

The board shall not issue a license to conduct a horse racing meeting at any place, track or inclosure, not used for horse racing meetings prior to July 1, 1941, unless prior to the beginning of the construction or preparation of such track for horse racing meetings, the board, upon application in such form as it may require, has determined that the conduct of horse racing meetings at such track will be in the public interest and will subserve the purposes of this chapter.

This section does not apply in respect to any
 track of not less than five-eighths of one mile in circumference or length partially or entirely in the infield of a mile track constructed and operated by a thoroughbred licensee under this article provided that such infield track is to be used solely for thoroughbred racing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19487.

Notwithstanding Section 19485, any licensed racing association operating a racetrack may construct another track of not less than one-half mile in circumference or length partially or entirely in the infield of such track, if prior to the beginning of construction or preparation of such track for horse race meetings, the board has determined upon application, in such form as it may require, that the conduct of horse race meetings at such track will be in the public interest and subserve the purposes of this chapter. A license may be granted to any harness racing
 association to conduct a harness racing meeting upon such a track of less than one mile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19488.

(a) Every license issued under this article shall specify the following:

(1) The name of the person to whom it is issued.

(2) The track where the horse racing meeting to which it relates is to be held or conducted.

(3) The days and hours of the day when the meeting will be permitted.

(4) The number and types of races to be run on each day of the meeting.

(5) The number of useable stalls available for the meeting.

(6) The name of the person responsible for supervising the maintenance of racetrack safety standards.

(b) The license shall also recite the payment to, and receipt by, the board of the deposit to secure payment of the license fee required by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19489.

A license issued under this article is not transferable nor does it permit the conduct of a horse racing meeting at any track not specified therein.

If, however, the track specified in a license becomes unsuitable for racing because of fire, flood, or other catastrophe, the meeting or any remaining portion thereof may be conducted at any other track specified by the board in the same area. The board may specify any other track within the area for the conduct of the meeting, whether or not such conduct would result in
 increasing the number of racing days in the county or area in which such track is situated. Before any other track is so specified, the board shall obtain the consent of the person licensed to conduct a meeting at the track which has become unsuitable for racing and of the owners and operators licensed to conduct a meeting at such other track.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19490.

Each application for a license to conduct a horse racing meeting shall be accompanied by a deposit to secure the payment of any license fee imposed by this article, in the form of a certified check payable to the Treasurer of the State of California, in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19491.

(a) Subject to Sections 19491.5 and 19491.6, and except as provided in Section 19491.7, every association which conducts a racing meeting shall pay as an additional license fee one-half of the breakage deducted pursuant to Section 19597 on the first twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000) or less, excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility, of the total amount handled in the parimutuel pools relating to its meeting and all of the breakage deducted on amounts so handled in excess of twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000),
 excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility.

(b) Every association which conducts a racing meeting shall distribute the remaining one-half of the breakage deducted pursuant to Section 19597 on the first twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000) or less, excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility, of the total amount handled in the parimutuel pools relating to the meeting as additional purses and for additional commissions in the same proportion, as between purses and commissions, as provided in Sections 19611, 19612, 19612.6, and 19614.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), one-half of all the breakage deducted pursuant to Section 19597 at fair racing meetings shall be retained and distributed as additional commissions.

Payment of the fee shall be made weekly on account during each meeting, and the amount attributable to
 breakage shall be reported as a separate item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19491.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 19491, an association, including the California Exposition and State Fair or a county or district agricultural association fair, which conducts, or whose predecessor association has conducted, a horseracing meeting during the preceding year at which the total amount handled in the parimutuel pools operated by the association, or by such predecessor association, is not more than two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility, shall be exempt from payment of that portion of the license fee provided in subdivision (a) of Section 19491 on the
 amount handled by it under one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000), excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility. All the money accruing pursuant to this section shall be distributed as purses. In addition, an association which conducts, or whose predecessor association has conducted, a horseracing meeting during the preceding year at which the total amount handled in the parimutuel pools operated by the association or predecessor association is more than two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), excluding wagering at a satellite wagering facility, shall be exempt from the payment of that portion of the license fee provided in subdivision (a) of Section 19491 on the amount handled in excess of twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000) but not in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000).

“Predecessor association,” as used in this section, means a person who was previously licensed to conduct racing of the same kind and at the same
 racing facility as the presently existing association.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the amendment to this section at its 1970 Regular Session shall be deemed to be a clarification of the effect of this section, and that such amendment does not constitute a substantive change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1285, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19491.6.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 19612, the exempt amount retained by the association shall be regularly deposited in a separate account with a depository approved by the board. The funds deposited shall be distributed as purses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1043, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

19491.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all breakage deducted pursuant to Section 19597 by an association licensed to conduct harness racing shall be used to fund the California Standardbred Sires Stakes Program as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 19619.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 595, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19493.

Upon the termination of the horse racing meeting for which a license has been granted:

(a) If the licensee has fully paid the license fee imposed by this article, the sum deposited with the application for the license shall be returned to the licensee.

(b) If the licensee fails, refuses, or neglects to pay such fee, the amount thereof shall be deducted from the sum deposited and the balance, if any, shall be returned to the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19494.

If by reason of any cause beyond control, and through no fault or neglect of any licensee, and when the licensee is not in default, it becomes impossible for the licensee to hold or conduct racing upon any day authorized by the board, the board, in its discretion and at the request of the licensee, may either return any fee paid by the licensee for racing on that day or, as a substitute for such day, may specify any other day for the holding or conducting of racing by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19495.

Except as provided in this chapter, no license or excise tax or fee in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) for each racing day shall be assessed against or collected from any licensee by the State or by any county, city, district, or any other body having the power to assess or collect any license, tax, or fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1828.)
-------------------------------------------

19497.

Any person who is licensed to conduct a horse racing meeting at any place, track or inclosure which is leased by him from the state, shall not transfer any such property to any other person, whether licensed under this chapter or not, for the purpose of furnishing such other person a place, track or inclosure at which it may conduct a horse racing meeting, unless such transfer is first submitted to the Department of General Services and the department finds that its terms and provisions are just and reasonable and approves of it.

As used in this section, “transfer” includes any sublease, permit to use, license to use, and any other transaction or arrangement of any kind or nature whereby any right to the use or possession of property, or any part thereof, for the purpose of conducting a horse racing meeting is conferred upon any person.

The provisions of this section which are applicable to a person licensed under this chapter to conduct a horse racing meeting shall also apply to any person to whom a transfer is made by such a licensee in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Jockeys [19500. - 19506.]

19500.

(a) A jockey who agrees to exercise a racehorse shall be paid no less than the standard rate that is paid to exercise riders unless the jockey has been employed to ride that racehorse in a parimutuel race or the jockey is engaged in an official timed and recorded workout. If there is a dispute over the standard rate for exercising a horse, the steward shall determine the rate.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations no later than July 1, 2007, consistent with existing practice of the stewards, that provide both of the following:

(1) Establish the circumstances under which a jockey is entitled to receive a mount fee when he or she is removed from a mount prior to scratch time.

(2) Establish the circumstances under which a jockey is entitled to receive both a mount fee and the riding fee when he or she is removed from a mount after scratch time.

(c) The paymaster of a racing association or racing fair shall not disburse any sum from a jockey’s compensation to any person other than the jockey except with the written permission of the jockey, upon order of the board, or pursuant to a court or administrative order.

(d) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Scratch time” means the time designated by the purse agreement when final changes in racing programs must be made.

(2) “Riding fee” means the amount of money, whether calculated as a percentage of the purse or by any other means, that is due to a jockey in addition to the jockey mount fee as a result of the performance of a racehorse in a race.

(3) “Mount fee” is the fee that is paid a jockey who accepts a mount on a racehorse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19501.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Professional jockeys are vital to the horse racing industry and the work they perform is very dangerous.

(2) The minimum wage that jockeys receive in a horse race is established by the board as a minimum jockey riding fee. Jockeys may earn additional compensation if the horse they are racing is a winning mount, a second place mount, or a third place mount.

(3) The minimum jockey riding fee has not kept up with inflation or the cost of living. Since 1970, the state minimum wage has increased at more than twice the rate that the average
 jockey riding fee increased over the same period.

(4) The riding fee should be increased at least as much on a percentage basis as the state minimum wage, so that the average full-time jockey can earn an income sufficient to provide for the basic necessities of life.

(b) (1) Effective January 1, 2010, the scale of minimum jockey riding fees for losing mounts established by the board shall be increased by ten dollars ($10) per mount from the rate in effect on December 31, 2009. Effective January 1, 2012, the scale of minimum jockey riding fees for losing mounts established by the board shall be increased by ten dollars ($10) per mount from the rate in effect on December 31, 2011, except the three lowest fees on the scale shall be increased by five dollars ($5) per mount. Thereafter, the scale of minimum jockey riding fees for losing mounts shall be increased
 whenever the state minimum wage is increased by the percentage of that increase.

(2) Effective January 1, 2010, the minimum amount awarded to the jockey who finishes second or third in a race shall be increased by ten dollars ($10) over the amount required to be paid on December 31, 2009. Effective January 1, 2012, the minimum amount awarded to the jockey who finishes second or third in a race shall be increased by five dollars ($5) over the amount required to be paid on December 31, 2011. This subdivision shall apply to races in which the purse is nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($9,999) or less.

(c) No jockey shall be paid less than the minimum jockey riding fees established pursuant to this section.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the board from increasing the minimum jockey riding fee above
 the minimum level required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 22.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

Notwithstanding any other law, the board shall not permit any portion of an entry, nomination, or other fee paid by an owner to be deducted from a jockey riding fee unless the entry, nomination, or other fee is paid exclusively by the owner and not reimbursed by any other person or entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 434, Sec. 1.   (AB 1226)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.

(a) No racehorse shall be ridden at a racetrack unless the rider is equipped with a safety helmet and safety vest.

(b) No later than July 1, 2006, the board shall conduct an investigation, including at least one public hearing, to determine whether the use of safety reins would provide jockeys and exercise riders greater protection from accidents and injuries than conventional reins. Should the board determine that the use of safety reins would provide greater protection for jockeys and exercise riders than conventional reins, it shall adopt a regulation no later than July 1, 2007, mandating the use of approved safety reins whenever a racehorse is ridden at a racetrack. The regulation adopted by the board may phase in the use of safety reins, but in the event safety reins are mandated, the board shall not permit the use of conventional reins in a parimutuel race for longer than 18 months following the adoption of the regulation.

(c) The board shall approve any model of safety helmet, safety vest, and mandatory safety rein, if required, in use at a racetrack.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a “safety rein” is a type of rein that is reinforced with a wire cable, nylon strap, or other safety device or material that is attached to the bit and designed to maintain control of the horse should the rein break.

(e) For the purposes of this section, a “conventional rein” is any rein other than a safety rein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

19506.

No later than July 1, 2006, the board shall approve and participate in a health assessment study of jockeys that will provide information relevant to the determination of an appropriate jockey scale of weights and weight control practices that will maximize jockey health and safety.

(a) The study shall be conducted under accepted scientific principles, shall be peer reviewed, and shall be performed under the auspices of a university based director with expertise in sports medicine, nutrition, or occupational safety and health. The study director shall be independent of the horse racing industry.

(b) The board shall form a committee to provide input and advice on the design of the study. The committee shall include members of the board, and representatives of the Thoroughbred Owners of California, the Jockey’s Guild, the California Thoroughbred Trainers, the Pacific Coast Quarter Horse Racing Association, the California Authority of Racing Fairs and of the racetracks. However, the board shall insure that no member of the committee nor any other person shall attempt to improperly interfere with study design or execution or compromise its integrity.

(c) The study shall be funded by private sources. Nothing in this section shall prevent the participation of racing regulatory bodies outside of California in the study.

(d) Upon completion of the study the board shall review the findings at a public hearing. If the board determines, upon review of the study, that the current scale of weights for jockeys is detrimental to jockey health and safety, it shall adopt regulations to establish weight or body composition requirements appropriate to maintain jockeys in a healthy and safe physical condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Stewards and Racing Officials [19510. - 19518.]

19510.

(a) Every steward and racing official not required to be licensed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 19480) shall be licensed by the board pursuant to this article. Any license issued pursuant to this article shall include a current photograph of the licensed person.

(b) No person required to be licensed pursuant to this article may participate in any capacity in any horse race meeting without a valid and unrevoked license. The board shall determine the fixed license fee which shall be paid in order to receive a license pursuant to this article.

(c) As used in this section, “racing official” means the starter,
 timer, paddock judge, horseshoe inspector, horse identifier, official veterinarian, racing veterinarian, associate judge, placing judge, patrol judge, clerk of scales, clerk of the course, and any other person acting as an official at any horse racing meeting.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 650) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 53, Sec. 1.   (AB 1152)   Effective July 9, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to effective date of Stats. 2009, Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

19512.

(a) The board shall require applicants for license as a steward or as an official veterinarian to pass both a written and an oral examination.

(b) The board may admit to the steward examination any person who meets all of the following qualifications:

(1) Has not been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude or of a felony.

(2) Has been given a physical examination by a licensed physician and surgeon within 60 days prior to the date of application for the steward’s examination, indicating at least 20-20 vision or vision corrected to at least 20-20, and normal hearing ability.

(3) Possesses at least one of the following qualifications:

(A) Has at least five years of experience in the parimutuel horse racing industry as a licensed trainer, jockey, or driver.

(B) Has at least 10 years of experience in the California parimutuel horse racing industry as a licensed owner whose experience, knowledge, ability, and integrity relative to the industry are known to the board.

(C) Has at least three years of experience as a licensed racing official, racing secretary, assistant racing secretary, or director of racing.

(D) Has experience in the horse racing industry of a character and for a length of time sufficient, as determined by the board, to qualify the person as having experience substantially equivalent to the experience described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C).

(c) The board may admit to the official veterinarian examination any person who meets all of the following qualifications:

(1) Is currently licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

(2) Is currently in good standing with the California Veterinary Medical Board.

(3) Has current veterinary malpractice insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19513.

(a) The board shall prepare both written and oral examinations. All examinations shall be standardized and, in the case of oral examinations, tape recorded. Written examinations may be administered by members of the board staff. Oral examinations for stewards shall be conducted by a panel of not less than three board members. Oral examinations for official veterinarians shall be conducted by a panel of not less than one board member, the equine medical director, and the executive director.

(b) The board shall provide a detailed outline of the subjects to be covered by the oral and written examinations for a license to every person who requests the outline.

(c) The results of the oral and written examinations for a steward’s license shall be a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19514.

Racing officials shall be licensed by the board pursuant to rules and regulations that the board may adopt, and upon payment of a license fee fixed and determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 871, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

19515.

(a) A license issued under this article shall be issued for a period not to exceed three years, which the board may, by regulation, establish. The board may establish a license fee schedule consistent with the different period for which these licenses may be granted.

(b) The license shall be valid at all horse racing meetings in this state during the period for which it is issued, unless it is suspended or revoked before the expiration of the period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 354, Sec. 2.   (AB 1768)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19516.

The board may, at any time, require the removal of any racing official or employee in any case where it has reason to believe that the official or employee has been guilty of any dishonest practice in connection with horse racing, has failed to comply with any condition of the licensee’s license, or has violated any law or any rule or regulation of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1082, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19517.

(a) The board, upon due consideration, may overrule any steward’s decision other than a decision to disqualify a horse due to a foul or a riding or a driving infraction in a race, if a preponderance of the evidence indicates any of the following:

(1) The steward mistakenly interpreted the law. 

(2) New evidence of a convincing nature is produced. 

(3) The best interests of racing and the state may be better served. 

(b) However, any decision pertaining to the finish of a race, as used for purposes of parimutuel fund distribution to winning ticketholders, may not be overruled. Furthermore, any decision pertaining to the distribution of purses may be changed only if a claim is made in writing to the board by one of the involved owners or trainers, and a preponderance of the evidence clearly indicates to the board that one or more of the grounds for protest, as outlined in regulations adopted by the board, has been substantiated. The chairperson of the board may issue a stay of execution pending appeal from a steward’s decision if the facts justify the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1052, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19517.5.

(a) The respondent in an enforcement proceeding that alleges the use of a prohibited substance, as defined under class I, class II, or class III of the board’s schedule of prohibited substances, may elect to have the proceeding referred, for administrative adjudication and preparation of a proposed decision for action by the board, to either a Board of Stewards or a hearing officer appointed by the board. The board shall select the hearing officer from a pool jointly developed by a representative from each of the following organizations:

(1) The board.

(2) A racing association.

(3) The trainers’ organization.

(4) The horse owners’ organization.

(b) The hearing before a duly appointed hearing officer or Board of Stewards shall commence no later than 90 days after the filing of the accusation. The hearing date may be extended only upon a showing of good cause to the earliest possible hearing date beyond the 90-day period, provided a written order and the reasons for the continuance are filed with the board.

(c) No later than 20 days before the hearing, the licensee shall post a bond with the paymaster of purses for the amount of the purse or purses in question and received by the licensee. The bond shall be in cash, or a surety bond that meets the requirements of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19518.

(a) (1) The board shall contract with persons licensed as stewards pursuant to this article to perform the duties of stewards at horse racing meets. The board shall also contract with licensed veterinarians pursuant to this article to perform the duties of official veterinarians at horse racing meets. Contracts shall be upon any terms that the board, the stewards, and the official veterinarians may mutually agree upon and may contain different rates of compensation based upon the experience of the steward or official veterinarian.

(2) The board shall establish a committee of at least two board members to meet at least quarterly with representatives of the stewards, so that recommendations of the stewards can be discussed as necessary. These meetings may be scheduled the same day as regular board meetings or at the convenience of the board. Representatives of associations may attend and participate in these meetings, or portions thereof, when items directly affecting the associations are discussed.

(3) The board shall provide remuneration, including any fringe benefits, to stewards, to the official veterinarian, and for the costs of laboratory testing relating to horse racing.

(b) Stewards, official veterinarians, and other racing officials appointed or approved by the board, and while performing duties required by this chapter or by the board, shall be entitled to the same rights and immunities granted public employees by Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that the services performed by stewards and official veterinarians at horse racing meetings are unique and cannot be performed adequately, competently, or satisfactorily by civil service personnel, and that the services cannot be adequately rendered by an existing public agency and do not duplicate the function of an existing public agency. Stewards and official veterinarians shall be personal service contractors of the board and shall not be civil service employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 400, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Other Licenses [19520. - 19526.]

19520.

(a) (1) Every person not required to be licensed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 19480) who participates in, or has anything to do with, the racing of horses in any of the following capacities shall be licensed by the board pursuant to rules and regulations that the board may adopt and upon the payment of a license fee fixed and determined by the board:

(A) Assistant trainer.

(B) Association employee.

(C) Bloodstock agent.

(D) Corporate officer.

(E) Driver.

(F) Exercise rider.

(G) Farrier.

(H) Jockey.

(I) Jockey agent.

(J) Jockey apprentice.

(K) Jockey valet.

(L) Off-track wagering personnel.

(M) Open claim owner.

(N) Outrider.

(O) Owner.

(P) Parimutuel employee.

(Q) Pony rider.

(R) Safety personnel.

(S) Special event personnel.

(T) Stable agent.

(U) Stable foreman.

(V) Stableworker.

(W) Stakeholder representative.

(X) Trainer.

(Y) Vendor or vendor employee.

(Z) Veterinarian.

(AA) Veterinarian assistant.

(2) Any license issued pursuant to this article shall include a current
 photograph of the licensed person.

(b) A person required to be licensed pursuant to this article shall not participate in any capacity in any horse race meeting without a valid and unrevoked license authorizing the participation.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to require outrider license applicants to pass both a written and an oral examination and to authorize outriders to exercise the duties and powers of the board set forth in Section 19440 as are delegated by the board.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Assistant trainer” means a person employed by a trainer that has passed the board-issued trainer’s examination but fails to meet the board’s minimum qualifications for a trainer’s license.

(2) “Association employee” means a person hired by a racing association that has access to the licensed inclosure. An “association employee” includes management of the racetrack and persons hired to work as maintenance, food service, media, security, and racing staff.

(3) “Bloodstock agent” means a person who for gain, gratuity, commission, or reward, in either money or goods, acts as an agent for the sale or purchase of any racehorse not their own that is eligible to race at an authorized race meeting in the state.

(4) “Corporate officer” means an officer, director, or partner, or an individual who holds 5 percent or more of outstanding shares, of an advance deposit wagering, mini-satellite wagering provider, simulcast service supplier, or totalizer company.

(5) “Driver” means a person who drives and controls the horse from a seated position on a two-wheel sulky.

(6) “Exercise rider” means a person mounted and exercising a horse within a licensed inclosure.

(7) “Farrier” means a person responsible for shoeing and caring for equine hooves. A “farrier” is also interchangeably referred to as a “horseshoer” or “plater.”

(8) “Jockey” means a race rider.

(9) “Jockey agent” means a person who represents a jockey whose main responsibility is to arrange and book mounts.

(10) “Jockey apprentice” means a race rider who otherwise meets the license qualifications of a jockey, but has not ridden the requisite number of winners, as established
 by the board.

(11) “Jockey valet” means a person responsible for preparing both jockey and horse for racing.

(12) “Off-track wagering personnel” means a person employed at an off-track simulcast wagering facility or a person employed to represent an organization overseeing off-track wagering at a simulcast location pursuant to section 19608.2.

(13) “Open-claim owner” means a prospective owner of a horse entered into a claiming race.

(14) “Outrider” means a person responsible for providing a safe environment during training or racing.
